lib/onlyoffice_language_helper/dictionaries/sl_SI/sl_SI.aff
SET ISO8859-2
TRY aeiontrmjlsvpdkuzè¹gbhc¾fwyæx

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0       po      .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0       pre     .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0       za      .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O   0       na      .

PFX X Y 1
PFX X   0       iz      .

SFX M Y 16
SFX M   0       a       [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       u       [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       om      [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       ov      [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       oma     [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       ih      [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       i       [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       e       [^aeiou]
SFX M   0       ta      e       
SFX M   0       tu      e       
SFX M   0       tom     e       
SFX M   0       tov     e       
SFX M   0       toma    e       
SFX M   0       tih     e       
SFX M   0       ti      e       
SFX M   0       te      e       

SFX J Y 16
SFX J   0       ja      [riuoae]
SFX J   0       ju      [riuoae]
SFX J   0       jem     [riuoae]
SFX J   0       jev     [riuoae]
SFX J   0       jema    [riuoae]
SFX J   0       jih     [riuoae]
SFX J   0       ji      [riuoae]
SFX J   0       je      [riuoae]
SFX J   0       a       [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       u       [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       em      [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       ev      [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       ema     [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       ih      [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       e       [cèj¾¹]
SFX J   0       i       [cèj¾¹]


SFX K Y 72
SFX K   ek      ka      ek 
SFX K   ek      ku      ek 
SFX K   ek      kom     ek 
SFX K   ek      kov     ek 
SFX K   ek      koma    ek 
SFX K   ek      kih     ek 
SFX K   ek      ke      ek 
SFX K   ek      ki      ek 
SFX K   el      la      el
SFX K   el      lu      el
SFX K   el      lom     el
SFX K   el      lov     el
SFX K   el      loma    el
SFX K   el      lih     el
SFX K   el      le      el
SFX K   el      li      el
SFX K   er      ra      er
SFX K   er      ru      er
SFX K   er      rom     er
SFX K   er      rov     er
SFX K   er      roma    er
SFX K   er      rih     er
SFX K   er      re      er
SFX K   er      ri      er
SFX K   ec      ca      ec
SFX K   ec      cu      ec
SFX K   ec      cem     ec
SFX K   ec      cev     ec
SFX K   ec      cema    ec
SFX K   ec      cih     ec
SFX K   ec      ce      ec
SFX K   ec      ci      ec
SFX K   em      ma      em
SFX K   em      mu      em
SFX K   em      mom     em
SFX K   em      mov     em
SFX K   em      moma    em
SFX K   em      mih     em
SFX K   em      me      em
SFX K   em      mi      em
SFX K   enj     nja     enj
SFX K   enj     nju     enj
SFX K   enj     njem    enj
SFX K   enj     njev    enj
SFX K   enj     njema   enj
SFX K   enj     njih    enj
SFX K   enj     nje     enj
SFX K   enj     nji     enj
SFX K   or      ra      or
SFX K   or      ru      or
SFX K   or      rom     or
SFX K   or      rov     or
SFX K   or      roma    or
SFX K   or      rih     or
SFX K   or      re      or
SFX K   or      ri      or
SFX K   et      ta      et
SFX K   et      tu      et
SFX K   et      tom     et
SFX K   et      tov     et
SFX K   et      toma    et
SFX K   et      tih     et
SFX K   et      te      et
SFX K   et      ti      et
SFX K   eg      ga      eg
SFX K   eg      gu      eg
SFX K   eg      gom     eg
SFX K   eg      gov     eg
SFX K   eg      goma    eg
SFX K   eg      gih     eg
SFX K   eg      ge      eg
SFX K   eg      gi      eg

SFX Z Y 34
SFX Z   a       e       a
SFX Z   a       i       a
SFX Z   a       o       a
SFX Z   a       0       a
SFX Z   a       ama     a
SFX Z   a       ah      a
SFX Z   a       am      a
SFX Z   a       mi      a
SFX Z   ev      ve      ev
SFX Z   ev      vi      ev
SFX Z   ev      vijo    ev
SFX Z   ev      vama    ev
SFX Z   ev      vah     ev
SFX Z   ev      vam     ev
SFX Z   ev      vami    ev
SFX Z   en      ni      en
SFX Z   en      nijo    en
SFX Z   en      nima    en
SFX Z   en      nih     en
SFX Z   en      nim     en
SFX Z   en      nimi    en
SFX Z   0       e       r
SFX Z   0       i       r
SFX Z   0       jo      r
SFX Z   0       ama     r
SFX Z   0       ah      r
SFX Z   0       am      r
SFX Z   0       ami     r
SFX Z   0       i       [^anrv]
SFX Z   0       jo      [^anrv]
SFX Z   0       im      [^anrv]
SFX Z   0       ih      [^anrv]
SFX Z   0       mi      [^anrv]
SFX Z   0       ma      [^anrv]

SFX S Y 14
SFX S   e       a       e
SFX S   e       u       e
SFX S   e       em      e
SFX S   e       i       e
SFX S   e       0       e
SFX S   e       ema     e
SFX S   e       ih      e
SFX S   o       a       o
SFX S   o       u       o
SFX S   o       om      o
SFX S   o       i       o
SFX S   o       0       o
SFX S   o       oma     o
SFX S   o       ih      o

SFX P Y 85
SFX P   ega     emu     ega
SFX P   ega     im      ega
SFX P   ega     a       ega
SFX P   ega     ih      ega
SFX P   ega     ima     ega
SFX P   ega     i       ega
SFX P   ega     e       ega
SFX P   ega     imi     ega
SFX P   ega     o       ega
SFX P   ega     em      ega
SFX P   ski     skega   ski
SFX P   ski     skemu   ski
SFX P   ski     skem    ski
SFX P   ski     skim    ski
SFX P   ski     ska     ski
SFX P   ski     skih    ski
SFX P   ski     skima   ski
SFX P   ski     skimi   ski
SFX P   ski     ske     ski
SFX P   ski     sko     ski
SFX P   0       ega     iv
SFX P   0       emu     iv
SFX P   0       em      iv
SFX P   0       im      iv
SFX P   0       va      iv
SFX P   0       ih      iv
SFX P   0       ima     iv
SFX P   0       vi      iv
SFX P   0       ve      iv
SFX P   0       imi     iv
SFX P   0       o       iv
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kega   ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kemu   ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kem    ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kim    ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹ka     ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kih    ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kima   ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹kimi   ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹ke     ¹ki
SFX P   ¹ki     ¹ko     ¹ki
SFX P   en      nega    en
SFX P   en      nemu    en
SFX P   en      nem     en
SFX P   en      nim     en
SFX P   en      na      en
SFX P   en      nih     en
SFX P   en      nima    en
SFX P   en      ni      en
SFX P   en      ne      en
SFX P   en      nimi    en
SFX P   en      no      en
SFX P   in      inega   in
SFX P   in      inemu   in
SFX P   in      inem    in
SFX P   in      inim    in
SFX P   in      ina     in
SFX P   in      inih    in
SFX P   in      inima   in
SFX P   in      ine     in
SFX P   in      ini     in
SFX P   in      ino     in
SFX P   in      inimi   in
SFX P   ev      evega   ev
SFX P   ev      evemu   ev
SFX P   ev      evem    ev
SFX P   ev      evim    ev
SFX P   ev      eva     ev
SFX P   ev      evih    ev
SFX P   ev      evima   ev
SFX P   ev      evi     ev
SFX P   ev      eve     ev
SFX P   ev      evimi   ev
SFX P   ev      evo     ev
SFX P   ov      ovega   ov
SFX P   ov      ovemu   ov
SFX P   ov      ovem    ov
SFX P   ov      ovim    ov
SFX P   ov      ova     ov
SFX P   ov      ovih    ov
SFX P   ov      ovima   ov
SFX P   ov      ovi     ov
SFX P   ov      ove     ov
SFX P   ov      ovimi   ov
SFX P   ov      ovo     ov

SFX Q Y 20
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹ega        ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹emu        ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹em         ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹im         ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹a          ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹ih         ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹ima        ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹e          ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹imi        ivej¹i
SFX Q   ivej¹i  ivej¹o          ivej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹ega         nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹emu         nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹em          nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹im          nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹a           nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹ih          nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹ima         nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹e           nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹imi         nej¹i
SFX Q   nej¹i   nej¹o           nej¹i

SFX R Y 9
SFX R   ¹i      ¹ega    ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹emu    ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹im     ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹a      ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹ih     ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹ima    ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹e      ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹imi    ¹i
SFX R   ¹i      ¹o      ¹i
